Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 4. Proceedings in Boundary Disputes

Cross references. —

As to county boundaries generally, see §

18-1-101

.

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Settlement of County Boundary Disputes,” V Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations, Counties, etc. §§ 39 to 43; 12 Am. Jur. 2d Boundaries § 1 et seq.

20 C.J.S. Counties §§ 13 to 18.

§ 18-1-401.
Commissioners to order surveyor of their respective counties to make survey.

Whenever a dispute arises between two (2) adjoining counties as to the location of the boundary line between them each board of county commissioners shall order their county surveyor to survey the disputed boundary line with the county surveyor of the other county at a time agreed upon by each board of county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 670; 1899 § 994; C.S. 1910, § 1041; C.S. 1920, § 1271; R.S. 1931, § 29-501; C.S. 1945, § 26-501; W.S. 1957, § 18-331; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Section 1, ch. 87, Laws 1886, contained a proviso clause relative to the boundary line between Crook and Johnson counties. It has not been carried since 1899.

Boundary to be established by survey. —

A proceeding, under this article, by one county to determine the boundary line between it and the adjoining county, is a proceeding to locate the line as designated by the law creating the counties, and that line must be established by the survey to be made in the proceeding. Board of Comm'rs v. Board of Comm'rs, 17 Wyo. 424, 100 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1909).

§ 18-1-402.
Duty of surveyors in making survey; joint report; findings conclusive if in agreement.

The county surveyors shall:

Mark the boundary line as located by them by placing or erecting at the end of each mile an easily discernible and durable monument upon which will be designated the point which it represents or locates;

Make a joint report of the boundary line agreed upon, attaching maps which show the location of the boundary line and all monuments placed or erected on the line.

The report shall be signed and sworn to by each surveyor and one (1) copy shall be filed with the county clerk of each county. The line agreed on by the county surveyors is located and binding upon both counties.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 671; 1899, § 995; C.S. 1910, § 1042; 1920, § 1272; R.S. 1931, § 29-502; C.S. 1945, § 26-502; W.S. 1957, § 18-332; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-403.
Reports of county surveyors to be separate when they disagree.

If the county surveyors do not agree in the location of the boundary line after making the survey provided by W.S.

18-1-402

they shall each make separate reports on the portion of the line upon which they do not agree, attaching maps showing the location of all monuments placed or erected on the line. One (1) report shall be filed with each county clerk.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 672; 1899, § 996; C.S. 1910, § 1043; C.S. 1920, § 1273; R.S. 1931, § 29-503; C.S. 1945, § 26-503; W.S. 1957, § 18-333; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Board of County Comm'rs, 17 Wyo. 424, 100 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1909).

§ 18-1-404.
Application to court for settlement when surveyors disagree; filing and notice of filing; court jurisdiction.

After the reports provided by W.S.

18-1-403

have been filed the county commissioners of either county may apply to the district court within their county for a hearing, describing the previous proceedings and attaching a certified copy of all records and reports which have been filed with the county clerk.

The application for a hearing shall be entitled “in the matter of disputed boundary line between . . . . . and . . . . . counties.” Upon receiving the application the clerk of court shall file and docket it and immediately notify the county clerk of the other county by registered mail of the filing and docketing and shall include a copy of the application. This notice is sufficient to establish the pendency of the matter.

When the requirements of this section have been met the district court has acquired jurisdiction and shall exclude the jurisdiction of any other court.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, §§ 4, 5; R.S. 1887, §§ 673, 674; 1899, §§ 997, 998; C.S. 1910, §§ 1044, 1045; C.S. 1920, §§ 1274, 1275; R.S. 1931, §§ 29-504, 29-505; C.S. 1945, §§ 26-504, 26-505; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-334, 18-335; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-1-405.
Court to appoint surveyor; filing of surveyor's report; action upon report; appeal.

Upon hearing the matter as provided by W.S.

18-1-404

and if the court is satisfied that all proceedings have been made pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

18-1-401

through

18-1-404

the court shall appoint a licensed surveyor who is not a resident of either interested county to survey the disputed boundary line. The court shall specify the time in which the survey is to be made.

The surveyor shall take and subscribe an oath to faithfully and impartially make a survey, and after making the survey shall make a report in triplicate, one (1) copy to be filed with the court and the others to be filed with the county clerks of each county. The report will be signed and sworn to by the surveyor and will contain maps showing the location of the boundary line in the same manner as provided by W.S.

18-1-402

.

When the report has been filed with the court, the boundary line is fixed and designated as shown in the report, unless the court sets aside the survey and report for being insufficient or indefinite upon the application of either county if made within sixty (60) days after the report has been filed in the court.

Any order of the court concerning the boundary line may be appealed to the supreme court, but the boundary line is conclusive until set aside. In the event the order is set aside, another surveyor may be appointed as provided by this section.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 675; 1899, § 999; C.S. 1910, § 1046; C.S. 1920, § 1276; R.S. 1931, § 29-506; C.S. 1945, § 26-506; W.S. 1957, § 18-336; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Board of County Comm'rs, 17 Wyo. 424, 100 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1909).

§ 18-1-406.
Application to court upon refusal to survey; action taken by court.

If a county involved in a boundary dispute fails to act as provided by W.S.

18-1-401

or if the boards of county commissioners cannot agree on a time for making a survey, the commissioners of the county wanting the dispute settled may apply to the district court in their county as provided by W.S.

18-1-404

, stating the circumstances of the dispute and the reasons why the dispute has not been settled.

The district court shall decide the dispute as provided by W.S.

18-1-404

and

18-1-405

.

History.

Laws 1886, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 676; 1899, § 1000; C.S. 1910, § 1047; C.S. 1920, § 1277; R.S. 1931, § 29-507; C.S. 1945, § 26-507; W.S. 1957, § 18-337; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Board of County Comm'rs, 17 Wyo. 424, 100 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1909).

§ 18-1-407.
Expenses and costs to be paid jointly.

The expenses of the costs of the surveys and court proceedings provided by W.S.

18-1-401

through

18-1-406

shall be paid equally by the counties involved in the dispute.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 87, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 677; 1899, § 1001; C.S. 1910, § 1048; C.S. 1920, § 1278; R.S. 1931, § 29-508; C.S. 1945, § 26-508; W.S. 1957, § 18-338; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.